Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-537
Service outside state.

When the exercise of personal jurisdiction is authorized by sections 25-535 to 25-541, service may be made outside this state.

Laws 1967, c. 143, § 3, p. 439.

Unless defendant transacts some business in Nebraska, jurisdiction over him may not be obtained hereunder by service outside the state. Conner v. Southern, 186 Neb. 164, 181 N.W.2d 446 (1970).

Concept of due process in Nebraska's long-arm statute is at least as broad as the constitutional standard of due process. Pioneer Ins. Co. v. Gelt, 558 F.2d 1303 (8th Cir. 1977).